Utah statutes.
70C-1-201.   Covered transactions.

Except as provided in Section 70C-1-202, the provisions of this title apply to all credit offered or extended by a creditor to an individual person primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.



Enacted by Chapter 159, 1985 General Session

